Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.68.700.
Determination of death by registered nurse.

A registered nurse licensed under this chapter may make a determination and pronouncement of death of a person under the following circumstances:

an attending physician has documented in the person’s medical or clinical record that the person’s death is anticipated due to illness, infirmity, or disease; this prognosis is valid for purposes of this section for no more than 120 days from the date of the documentation;

at the time of documentation under (1) of this subsection, the physician authorized in writing a specific registered nurse or nurses to make a determination and pronouncement of the person’s death; however, if the person is in a health care facility and the health care facility has complied with (d) of this section, the physician may authorize all nurses employed by the facility to make a determination and pronouncement of the person’s death.

A registered nurse who has determined and pronounced death under this section shall document the clinical criteria for the determination and pronouncement in the person’s medical or clinical record and notify the physician who determined that the prognosis for the patient was for an anticipated death. The registered nurse shall sign the death certificate, which must include the

name of the deceased;

presence of a contagious disease, if known; and

date and time of death.

Except as otherwise provided under AS

18.50.230

, a physician licensed under AS 08.64 shall certify a death determined under (b) of this section within 24 hours after the pronouncement by the registered nurse.

In a health care facility in which a physician chooses to proceed under (a) of this section, written policies and procedures shall be adopted that provide for the determination and pronouncement of death by a registered nurse under this section. A registered nurse employed by a health care facility may not make a determination or pronouncement of death under this section unless the facility has written policies and procedures implementing and ensuring compliance with this section.

Notwithstanding AS

08.68.800(a)(1)

, this section applies to a qualified nurse described in AS

08.68.800(a)(1)

who is employed by a federal health care facility.

The Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations to implement this section.

In this section,

“determination of death” means observation and assessment that a person is dead, as defined in AS

09.68.120

;

“health care facility” means a private, municipal, state, or federal hospital, psychiatric hospital, tuberculosis hospital, skilled nursing facility, kidney disease treatment center (excluding freestanding hemodialysis units), intermediate care facility, or Alaska Pioneers’ Home or Alaska Veterans’ Home administered by the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.55.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

08.68.395

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “AS

08.68.800(a)(1)

” was substituted for “AS

08.68.400

(a)(1)” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

08.68.400

.

Sec. 08.68.705.
Maximum dosage for opioid prescriptions.

An advanced practice registered nurse may not issue

an initial prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult patient for outpatient use;

a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to a minor; at the time an advanced practice registered nurse writes a prescription for an opioid for a minor, the advanced practice registered nurse shall discuss with the parent or guardian of the minor why the prescription is necessary and the risks associated with opioid use.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an advanced practice registered nurse may issue a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to an adult or minor patient if, in the professional judgment of the advanced practice registered nurse, more than a seven-day supply of an opioid is necessary for

the patient’s acute medical condition, chronic pain management, pain associated with cancer, or pain experienced while the patient is in palliative care; the advanced practice registered nurse may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient’s medical condition, chronic pain, pain associated with cancer, or pain experienced while the patient is in palliative care; the advanced practice registered nurse shall document in the patient’s medical record the condition triggering the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; or

a patient who is unable to access a practitioner within the time necessary for a refill of the seven-day supply because of a logistical or travel barrier; the advanced practice registered nurse may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the patient for the time that the patient is unable to access a practitioner; the advanced practice registered nurse shall document in the patient’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; in this paragraph, “practitioner” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

This section does not authorize an advanced practice registered nurse to prescribe a controlled substance if the advanced practice registered nurse is not otherwise authorized to prescribe a controlled substance under policies, procedures, or regulations issued or adopted by the board.

In this section,

“adult” means

an individual who has reached 18 years of age; or

an emancipated minor;

“emancipated minor” means a minor whose disabilities have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

;

“minor” means an individual under 18 years of age who is not an emancipated minor.

History.

(§ 22 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 22, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect on July 26, 2017.